Nebraska statutes.
Sec.
14.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,196
Apportionable vehicles; International Registration Plan; effect.

Apportionable
vehicles registered as provided in section 60-3,198 and apportionable vehicles
covered under the International Registration Plan shall be deemed fully registered
in all jurisdictions where apportioned or granted reciprocity for any type
of movement or operation. The registrant must have proper interjurisdiction
or intrajurisdiction authority from the appropriate regulatory agency of each
jurisdiction of this state if not exempt from regulation by the regulatory
agency.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 196;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB239, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 14.